Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 32. CORPORATIONS

CHAPTER 17. TRUST COMPANIES AND INVESTMENTS

Art. 1524b. HOUSING CORPORATIONS AUTHORIZED. Corporations may be formed wholly for the purpose of providing housing for families of low income and/or for reconstruction of slum areas, provided such corporations are regulated by state or municipal law, as hereinafter provided as to rents, charges, capital structure, rate of return and areas and methods of operation.

Acts 1932, 42nd Leg., 3rd C.S., p. 107, ch. 42, Sec. 1.

Art. 1524c. APPLICATION FOR INCORPORATION. Applications for charters for corporations, the creation of which are authorized under the provisions of this Act, in addition to requirements now prescribed by law, must be accompanied by a certificate executed by the officials of the governing body of the municipality in which said corporation contemplate owning or operating any properties certifying that the capital structure thereof and the plans and specifications of the proposed building has the approval of such governing body, provided, that where said corporation contemplates the owning or operating of properties situated outside the corporate limits of any organized town, city or village, then the certification herein referred to shall be executed by the Commissioners' Court of any county in which it is contemplated to own and/or operate properties within the scope of this Act. Such certificate shall not be binding upon the Secretary of State who shall proceed to file or refuse to file the charter in accordance with the provisions of existing laws.

Acts 1932, 42nd Leg., 3rd C.S., p. 107, ch. 42, Sec. 2.

Art. 1524d. POWERS; FEES AND TAXES. Any corporation organized under the provisions of this Act shall have, except as herein provided, all the powers of private domestic corporations which have been heretofore organized under the provisions of the laws of the State of Texas, and shall pay all fees and taxes which are required to be paid by private domestic corporations organized and/or existing under the laws of the State of Texas.

Acts 1932, 42nd Leg., 3rd C.S., p. 107, ch. 42, Sec. 3.

Art. 1524e. REGULATION BY MUNICIPALITIES OR COUNTIES. The rents, charges, capital structure, rate of return and areas and method of operation of any corporation organized under the provisions of Section 1 hereof shall be regulated, as hereinafter provided, by the governing body of any municipality or county where the properties to be owned or operated are situated outside the corporate limits of any organized town, city or village in which said corporation owns and operates any property. Should any such corporation own and operate properties in more than one municipality, the governing body of each municipality or county, where the properties to be owned or operated are situated outside the corporate limits of any organized town, city or village in which property of the corporation is situated, shall regulate in the manner prescribed by this Act the rents, charges, rate of return and area and method of operation of the property located within the territorial limits of such municipality or county, where the properties to be owned or operated are situated outside the corporate limits of any organized town, city or village, provided the governing body of a county shall not have the jurisdiction of regulation of property of such corporation situated within the corporate limits of a town, village, or city.

Acts 1932, 42nd Leg., 3rd C.S., p. 107, ch. 42, Sec. 4.

Art. 1524f. RATE OF RETURN RESTRICTED. The governing body fixing the rate of return for a corporation organized under the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall not fix such rates of return to yield a net amount in excess of eight (8%) per cent upon the invested capital of such corporation.

Acts 1932, 42nd Leg., 3rd C.S., p. 107, ch. 42, Sec. 5.

Art. 1524g. RULES AND REGULATIONS TO BE PRESCRIBED AND PLANS APPROVED. Such governing body may establish rules and regulations governing its procedure for hearings in fixing or amending orders or ordinances fixing the rents, charges, rate of return and areas and methods of corporations organized under the provisions of Section 1 hereof, and before any building is erected by such corporation, the detailed plans and specifications thereof, must be approved by the governing body of the municipality or county, where the properties to be owned or operated are situated outside the corporate limits of any organized town, city or village in which such building is to be erected.

Acts 1932, 42nd Leg., 3rd C.S., p. 107, ch. 42, Sec. 6.

Art. 1524h. APPEAL FROM ORDER FIXING RATE OF RETURN. Any corporation organized and existing under and by virtue of provisions of Section 1 hereof, which shall be dissatisfied with any rents, charges, rate of return and area and method of operation which is fixed or may be fixed or may be changed by any governing body, may, by giving to such governing body ten (10) days notice by registered mail of its intention thereof, appeal to any district court of the county wherein the property which is affected is situated. The appeal shall be perfected by filing suit in the district court of the county in which the property is situated within ten (10) days after the giving of such notice, and the filing of such suit shall suspend the order, rule, regulation, or ordinance from which the appeal is perfected. The municipality or county, where the properties to be owned or operated are situated outside the corporate limits of any organized town, city or village shall be defendant in said suit. The trial shall be de novo, and Court, upon a hearing, shall, by its judgment, regulate the rents, charges, rate of return, areas and method of operation of the corporation.

Acts 1932, 42nd Leg., 3rd C.S., p. 107, ch. 42, Sec. 7.

Art. 1524i. LOANS FROM RECONSTRUCTION FINANCE CORPORATION. Any corporation created under the provisions of this Act, in addition to the powers herein granted, shall have full power and authority to do all things necessary to secure loans from the Reconstruction Finance Corporation under the rules and regulations prescribed by said Reconstruction Finance Corporation.

Acts 1932, 42nd Leg., 3rd C.S., p. 107, ch. 42, Sec. 8.

Art. 1524j. ANTI-TRUST LAWS NOT AFFECTED. Provided that nothing in this Act shall in anywise affect or nullify the Anti-trust laws of this State.

Acts 1932, 42nd Leg., 3rd C.S., p. 107, ch. 42, Sec. 9.

Art. 1524k. RESTRAINING VIOLATION OF ORDERS, RULES OR REGULATIONS; PUNISHMENT FOR VIOLATION OF INJUNCTION. If any agent, servant, officer or employee of any corporation created under the provisions of this Act shall wilfully violate any order, rule, regulation or ordinance fixing rents, charges, rate of return, areas and method of operation, the District Court of the County in which the property of such corporation is situated, upon application of the governing body of the municipality or county, where the properties to be owned or operated are situated outside the corporate limits of any organized town, city or village wherein the corporation owns property, may issue during its term or in vacation a temporary writ of injunction restraining such agents, servants, officers or employees from any violation of such order, rule, regulation or ordinance and which temporary writ of injunction may be made permanent upon notice and hearing in the manner now provided by law. No bond shall be required before issuing any such temporary or permanent injunction and if any such injunction is violated by the agents, servants, officers or employees of said corporation, the Court, in addition to its power to punish for contempt, may order that the building of such corporation shall not be used or occupied for any period not to exceed one year but the Court shall permit said building to be occupied or used if the owner, lessee, tenant or occupant thereof shall give bond with sufficient surety to be provided by the Court in the sum of not less than Five Hundred ($500.00) Dollars nor more than One Thousand ($1,000.00) Dollars, payable to the Judge of said Court, conditioned that said corporation, its agents, servants, officers or employees will thereafter comply with the orders, rules, regulations or ordinances which have been or may be promulgated, fixing the rents, charges, or rate of return, areas and methods of operation of said corporation and that it will pay all fines and costs that may be assessed in contempt proceedings against its agents, servants, officers and employees for the violation of any writ of injunction existing, or which may thereafter be issued.

Acts 1932, 42nd Leg., 3rd C.S., p. 107, ch. 42, Sec. 10. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1039, Sec. 4.08, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.